Idaho, session 2025, H0083.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 90, Title 18, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 90
IMMIGRATION COOPERATION AND ENFORCEMENT ACT
18-9001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Immigration Cooperation and Enforcement Act."
18-9002. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Alien" has the meaning assigned by 8 U.S.C. 1101, as that provision
existed on January 1, 2023.
(2) "Custodial authority" means the director of the department of cor-
rection, county sheriffs, city chiefs of police, and any of their subordi-
nates with the power to confine or detain a person under color of law.
(3) "Dangerous crime" means any felony crime as described in Idaho Code
or in similar state or federal code, any offense for which an extended term of
imprisonment may be imposed pursuant to section 19-2520B, Idaho Code, or any
offense requiring sex offender registration as set forth in section 18-8304,
Idaho Code.
(4) "Dangerous illegal alien" means an illegal alien who has previously
been convicted or found guilty, by judgment or withheld judgment, of a dan-
gerous crime in this state or in any other state or nation.
(5) "DHS" means the United States department of homeland security and
its subordinate agencies and divisions.
(6) "Illegal alien" means a person eighteen (18) years of age or older
who is verified by the federal government to be present in the United States
in violation of the federal immigration and nationality act, 8 U.S.C., and
federal rules promulgated in accordance therewith.
(7) "Immigration detainer" means a notice or other documentation is-
sued by United States immigration and customs enforcement requesting that a
custodial authority or law enforcement official maintain temporary custody
of an illegal alien, including a DHS form I-247 document or a similar succes-
sor form.
(8) "Law enforcement official" means all state, county, and local law
enforcement officers, prosecuting attorneys, and city attorneys.


(9) "Port of entry" means a port of entry in the United States pursuant
to 19 CFR 101.
18-9003. ILLEGAL ENTRY FROM FOREIGN NATION. (1) A person who is an
alien commits an offense if the person enters or attempts to enter this state
at any location other than a lawful port of entry or through another manner
of lawful entry.
(2) A violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor upon a first con-
viction. A second or subsequent conviction shall be a felony.
(3) Law enforcement officers may enforce the provisions of this section
only when a person is detained or investigated for suspected commission of
an independent crime under title 18, Idaho Code, excluding this chapter, or
under chapter 27, title 37, Idaho Code.
(4) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution under this sec-
tion that:
(a) The federal government has granted the defendant:
(i) Lawful presence in the United States; or
(ii) Asylum under 8 U.S.C. 1158;
(b) The defendant's conduct does not constitute a violation of 8 U.S.C.
1325(a);
(c) The defendant was not investigated for, charged with, or convicted
of committing the independent crime for which the defendant was de-
tained or investigated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section; or
(d) The defendant was approved for benefits under the federal deferred
action for childhood arrivals program between June 15, 2012, and July
16, 2021.
(5) The following federal programs do not provide an affirmative de-
fense for purposes of subsection (4)(a) of this section:
(a) The deferred action for parents of Americans and lawful permanent
residents program; and
(b) Any program not enacted by the United States congress that is a suc-
cessor to or materially similar to the program described by subsection
(4)(d) or paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a de-
fendant shall not be eligible for deferred adjudication or a withheld judg-
ment if the defendant is charged with or convicted of an offense pursuant to
this section.
18-9004. ILLEGAL REENTRY BY CERTAIN ALIENS. (1) A person who is an
alien commits an offense if the person enters, attempts to enter, or is at any
time found in this state after the person:
(a) Has been denied admission to or excluded, deported, or removed from
the United States; or
(b) Has departed from the United States while an order of exclusion, de-
portation, or removal is outstanding.
(2) A violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor, except that the
violation shall be a felony if:
(a) The defendant's removal was subsequent to a conviction for commis-
sion of two (2) or more misdemeanors involving drugs, crimes against a
person, or both;


(b) The defendant was excluded pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1225(c) because the
defendant was excludable under 8 U.S.C. 1182(a)(3)(B);
(c) The defendant was removed pursuant to the provisions of 8 U.S.C.
chapter 12, subchapter V; or
(d) The defendant was removed pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1231(a)(4)(B).
(3) For purposes of this section, "removal" includes any agreement in
which an alien stipulates to removal pursuant to a criminal proceeding pur-
suant to either federal or state law.
(4) Law enforcement officers may enforce the provisions of this section
only when a person is detained or investigated for suspected commission of
an independent crime under title 18, Idaho Code, excluding this chapter, or
under chapter 27, title 37, Idaho Code.
(5) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution under this sec-
tion that the defendant was not investigated for, charged with, or convicted
of committing the independent crime for which the defendant was detained or
investigated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a de-
fendant shall not be eligible for deferred adjudication or withheld judgment
if the defendant is charged with or convicted of an offense pursuant to this
section.
18-9005. COOPERATION WITH FEDERAL AUTHORITIES. (1) To the extent au-
thorized by federal law, law enforcement officials shall be authorized to
send, receive, and maintain information relating to the immigration status
of illegal aliens for public safety purposes. Except as provided by fed-
eral law, law enforcement officials shall not be prohibited from receiving
or maintaining information relating to the immigration status of any illegal
alien or sending or exchanging such information with other federal, state,
or local law enforcement agencies for official public safety purposes.
(2) Law enforcement officials shall not be prohibited from entering
into memorandums of understanding, agreements, and memorandums of agreement
with the United States department of justice, DHS, or any other federal law
enforcement agency for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration laws,
including section 287(g) of the federal illegal immigration reform and
immigrant responsibility act of 1996, P.L. 104-208, or a similar federal
program.
(3) Except as provided by federal law, no law enforcement official
shall be prohibited from utilizing available federal resources, including
databases, equipment, grant funds, training, or participation in incentive
programs, for any public safety purpose related to the enforcement of fed-
eral immigration laws as against illegal aliens.
(4) Where a custodial authority has custody of a person in a correc-
tional facility, state rehabilitation center, penitentiary, prison, county
jail, or city jail, and the person is subject to an immigration detainer or
other federal warrant, the custodial authority shall comply with, honor, and
fulfill any reasonable request made in the immigration detainer or warrant
as long as any term of state-ordered confinement has been satisfied and it
does not impose undue burden, risk, or expense on the custodial authority or
law enforcement officials and shall inform the person identified in the im-


migration detainer or warrant that the person is being held pursuant to such
immigration detainer or warrant.
18-9006. TRAFFICKING A DANGEROUS ILLEGAL ALIEN. (1) The crime of traf-
ficking a dangerous illegal alien is committed when a person knowingly and
willfully transports into this state a dangerous illegal alien that the per-
son knows, or reasonably should know, is a dangerous illegal alien.
(2) A person commits a separate offense for each individual transported
into this state in violation of the provisions of this section.
(3) Whoever commits the crime of trafficking a dangerous illegal alien
shall be guilty of a felony and imprisoned for not less than one (1) year
and not more than two (2) years, fined not more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000), or both.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not apply if the defendant is
a necessary witness to or victim of a crime of domestic violence, rape, sex-
ual exploitation, sexual assault, murder, manslaughter, assault, battery,
human trafficking, kidnapping, false imprisonment, involuntary servitude,
fraud in foreign labor contracting, blackmail, extortion, or witness tam-
pering where the referenced crime occurred during the defendant's act of
transporting the dangerous illegal alien.
18-9007. SENTENCING ENHANCEMENT. Any person eighteen (18) years of
age or older who is found guilty of or pleads guilty to any dangerous crime
shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of confinement to the custody
of the state board of correction for a period of not less than five (5) years
if it is found by the trier of fact that previous to the commission of such
dangerous crime the defendant has been deported or is under order of removal
or deportation pursuant to federal authority.
18-9008. DETERMINATION OF ALIENAGE UPON CONFINEMENT. (1) Following an
arrest for a criminal offense, the custodial authority shall determine as
part of the booking process if the person may be a foreign national. If it is
determined that the person is a foreign national, then the custodial author-
ity shall notify DHS of the identity of the person so confined and the place
of confinement. Such notification shall be provided within forty-eight (48)
hours of the person being placed in confinement.
(2) A person's status as a foreign national shall be considered suspect
if the person cannot provide:
(a) A valid Idaho driver's license;
(b) A valid Idaho identification card;
(c) A valid United States passport;
(d) Any valid driver's license or identification card issued by a state
or district or territory of the United States, provided the issuing
authority limits issuance of the foregoing to persons who demonstrate
lawful presence in the United States;
(e) Any valid identification card issued by the United States, includ-
ing those issued by the department of defense, provided the issuing
authority limits issuance of the foregoing to persons who demonstrate
lawful presence in the United States; or


(f) Any other information sufficiently reliable to demonstrate the
identity of the confined person and the person's lawful presence in the
United States.
18-9009. CONDITIONS OF RELEASE OF ILLEGAL ALIEN FROM CONFINE-
MENT. Following entry of a judgment of conviction for a criminal offense,
no person eighteen (18) years of age or older that is known to be an illegal
alien shall be released from confinement in any correctional facility, state
rehabilitation center, penitentiary, prison, county jail, or city jail un-
til the determinate sentence has been completed, and thereafter may only be
released prior to the person's completion of his indeterminate sentence if
the alien is being released into the custody of law enforcement officials
from another state or the federal government for further criminal proceed-
ings or if the custodial authority first obtains written confirmation from
DHS that DHS will take custody of the person upon release and deport the
person from the United States. An illegal alien shall not be eligible to par-
ticipate in alternate sentencing programs such as work release, inmate labor
detail, a scheduled sentence program, or similar programs.
18-9010. AUTHORITY TO TRANSPORT ILLEGAL ALIENS. A law enforcement of-
ficial of the custodial authority shall be authorized to securely transport
such illegal alien to a federal facility in this state or to any other tempo-
rary point of detention when complying with a valid immigration detainer or a
federal arrest warrant or pursuant to release arranged with DHS pursuant to
section 18-9009, Idaho Code.
18-9011. IMMUNITY. A law enforcement official or custodial authority
acting in good faith to carry out duties or activities allowed by this chap-
ter shall have immunity from damages or liability from such actions.
18-9012. ABATEMENT OF PROSECUTION ON BASIS OF IMMIGRATION STATUS DE-
TERMINATION PROHIBITED. A court may not abate the prosecution of an offense
pursuant to this chapter on the basis that a federal determination regarding
the immigration status of the defendant is pending or will be initiated.
18-9013. INTERPRETATION. (1) The provisions of this chapter relating
to immigration terminology and definitions shall be construed to have the
same meanings as provided under federal immigration law, unless otherwise
defined in this chapter.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall be construed and implemented
in a manner consistent with federal laws and regulations and interpretive
case law governing immigration and civil rights.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.


SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.